Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5880.
people of the state of michigan enact: ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "services excise tax act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Covered service" means a service subject to the excise tax under article 2. (b) "Department" means the department of treasury. (c) "Excise tax" means the excise tax imposed on covered services under section 7. Sec. 5. As used in this act: (a) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. (b) "Purchase" means to acquire the performance or delivery of a covered service for consideration. (c) "Purchase price" or "price" means the total amount of consideration paid by the purchaser to the service provider to perform or deliver a covered service. (d) "Purchaser" means the person that purchases a covered service for use or consumption in this state. (e) "Service" means an activity engaged in for another person for a fee, retainer, commission, or other consideration, including a professional service, which activity predominantly involves the performance or delivery of a task or process as distinguished from the transfer or production of tangible personal property. In determining whether an activity is a service for purposes of this act, the intended use, principal objective, or ultimate objective of contracting parties is not controlling. (f) "Service provider" means a person performing or delivering a covered service. However, if the department determines that it is necessary for the efficient administration of this act to regard a person as an agent of a supervisor, employer, or other person under whom the person operates or on behalf of whom the person performs or delivers a covered service, irrespective of whether that person is performing or delivering a covered service on the person's own behalf or on behalf of a supervisor, employer, or other person, the department may regard that person as an agent and may consider the supervisor, employer, or other person under whom the person operates or on behalf of whom the person performs or delivers a covered service as performing or delivering the covered service for the purposes of this act. (g) "Taxpayer" means a person subject to an excise tax under this act. ARTICLE 2. EXCISE TAX ON COVERED SERVICES Sec. 7. (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), an excise tax is levied on the privilege of using or consuming covered services in this state at a rate equal to 6% of the price of the covered services. (2) A service taxed under the general sales tax act, 1933 PA 167, MCL 205.51 to 205.78, or the use tax act, 1937 PA 94, MCL 205.91 to 205.111, is not subject to the excise tax under this act. (3) A service provider that has nexus with this state shall collect the excise tax from the purchaser. A service provider that fails to collect the excise tax is personally liable for the amount the service provider failed to collect, together with penalty and interest on the excise tax. (4) If a service provider does not have nexus with this state, the purchaser must remit and is liable for the excise tax. (5) Nexus must be determined for purposes of this act in the same manner that nexus is determined under the use tax act, 1937 PA 94, MCL 205.91 to 205.111. ARTICLE 3. ADMINISTRATION AND ENFORCEMENT OF THE EXCISE TAX Sec. 11. For the purpose of proper administration of this act and to prevent evasion of the excise tax, evidence that a covered service has been received in this state is prima facie evidence that the covered service is subject to the excise tax. Sec. 13. (1) A service provider that performs or delivers covered services in this state shall register with the department and give the name and address of each agent operating in this state, the location of all places of business in this state, and any other information that the department requires that is relevant to the enforcement of this act. (2) The department of licensing and regulatory affairs shall not issue to any foreign person engaged in the business of performing or delivering covered services a certificate of authority to do business in this state or approve and file any proposed documents of organization submitted to it by any domestic person authorizing or permitting that person to conduct any business of performing or delivering covered services in this state unless the foreign person or domestic person submits with the application for the certificate of authority or proposed documents of organization an application for registration of the person under this act. The department of licensing and regulatory affairs shall transmit each application for registration under this act that it receives to the department. (3) A domestic or foreign person authorized to conduct business in this state and engaged in the business of performing or delivering covered services that submits a certificate of dissolution or requests a certificate of withdrawal from this state shall request a certificate from the department stating that taxes are not due under section 27a of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.27a, not more than 60 days after submitting the certificate of dissolution or requesting the certificate of withdrawal. A person that does not request a certificate stating that taxes are not due is subject to the same penalties under section 24 of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.24, that a taxpayer would be subject to for failure to file a return. Sec. 15. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, on or before the twentieth day of each calendar month, a taxpayer shall file with the department a return for the preceding calendar month, in a form prescribed by the department, showing the price of each purchase of covered services during the preceding month, and other information the department considers necessary for the proper administration of this act. At the same time, each taxpayer shall pay to the department the amount of excise tax imposed by this act with respect to the purchases of covered services covered by the return. (2) If a service provider had a total excise tax liability in the immediately preceding calendar year of $720,000.00 or more, on or before the twentieth day of the month, the service provider shall remit to the department, by an electronic funds transfer method approved by the department, an amount equal to 75% of the service provider's liability under this act in the immediately preceding month or 75% of the service provider's liability for the same month in the immediately preceding calendar year, whichever is less, plus a reconciliation payment equal to the difference between the excise tax liability determined for the immediately preceding month minus the amount of excise tax previously paid for that month. (3) If the department considers it necessary to ensure payment of the excise tax or to provide a more efficient administration, the department may require and prescribe the filing of returns and payment of the excise tax for periods other, but not more frequently, than monthly periods. (4) The excise tax accrues to this state on the last day of each calendar month. (5) If a due date falls on a Saturday, Sunday, state holiday, or legal banking holiday, the excise taxes are due on the next succeeding business day. Sec. 17. (1) For purposes of the excise tax imposed under this act, a taxpayer shall source a transaction for a covered service as follows: (a) If the covered service is received by the purchaser or the purchaser's designee at a business location of the service provider, the transaction is sourced to that business location. (b) If the covered service is not received by the purchaser or the purchaser's designee at a business location of the service provider, the transaction is sourced to the location where the covered service is received by the purchaser or the purchaser's designee, if known to the service provider. (c) If a transaction for a covered service is not sourced under subdivision (a) or (b), the transaction is sourced to the location indicated by the purchaser's address available from the service provider's business records maintained in the ordinary course of the service provider's business, if use of the address does not constitute bad faith. (d) If a transaction for a covered service is not sourced under subdivision (a), (b), or (c), the transaction is sourced to the location indicated by the purchaser's address obtained at the completion of the transaction, including the address of the purchaser's payment instrument if no other address is available, if use of the address does not constitute bad faith. (e) If a transaction for a covered service is not sourced under subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d) or the service provider has insufficient information to source the transaction under subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d), the transaction must be sourced to the location where the service provider performed the covered service. (2) As used in this section, "receive" means making first use of a service. Sec. 19. (1) A service provider shall separately state the excise tax levied under this act on any receipt, invoice, bill, or similar document given to the purchaser. (2) The service provider shall compute the excise tax to the third decimal place and round up to a whole cent when the third decimal place is greater than 4 or round down to a whole cent when the third decimal place is 4 or less. (3) The excise tax collected by the service provider from a purchaser under this act is for the benefit of this state. A person other than this state shall not derive a benefit from the collection or payment of the excise tax under this act. Sec. 21. (1) The department shall administer the excise tax under 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 to 205.31, and this act. If 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 to 205.31, and this act conflict, this act applies. (2) The department may promulgate rules to implement this act pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (3) The department may use the assistance, information, or records of other state departments and agencies in the performance of its duties under this act, and other state departments and agencies shall furnish the assistance, information, or records on the request of the department. Sec. 23. (1) If a service provider refunds or provides a credit for all or a portion of an amount paid for a covered service subject to the excise tax within the time period stated in that service provider's refund policy or 180 days after the initial billing for the covered service, whichever is sooner, that service provider shall also refund or provide a credit for the excise tax paid on all or that portion of the amount paid for the covered service that is refunded or credited. (2) A cause of action against a service provider for collecting an amount greater than the excise tax levied under this act does not accrue until the purchaser has provided written notice of that claim to the service provider and the service provider has had 60 days to respond. The purchaser shall provide sufficient information to determine the validity of the claim in the notice provided to the service provider. Sec. 25. A taxpayer shall make a final return under this act within 15 days after the date that the taxpayer sells that taxpayer's business, including through an asset sale, or quits the business. The taxpayer's successor or succeeding successors in the business, if any, shall withhold a sufficient amount of the purchase money to cover the amount of the excise taxes, interest, and penalties due and unpaid until the time the former owner produces either a receipt from the department showing that the excise taxes, interest, and penalties have been paid or a certificate stating that taxes are not due. If the purchaser or succeeding purchasers of a business fail to withhold a portion of the purchase money as required by this section, that person is personally liable for the payment of the excise taxes, interest, and penalties accrued and unpaid because of the operation of the business by the former owner. Unless the department files a lien for total excise tax liability at the register of deeds office in the county where the business is located, the purchaser shall not be held liable for payment of the taxes, interest, and penalties accrued and unpaid by the former owner. Sec. 27. (1) A service provider liable for any tax under this act shall keep in a paper, electronic, or digital format accurate and complete daily records of all covered services provided, receipts, invoices, and all pertinent documents in a form the department requires. These records must be retained for a period of 4 years after the excise tax imposed under this act to which the records apply is due or as otherwise provided by law. (2) A service provider that provides both covered services and services that are not covered services shall maintain books and records to show separately the transactions for covered services used to determine the amount of the excise tax levied under this act. If the service provider fails to maintain separate books and records as required under this subsection, the excise tax under this act is levied on all services provided by the service provider. (3) If the department considers it necessary, the department may require a person, by notice served on that person, to make a return, render under oath certain statements, or keep certain records the department considers sufficient to show whether or not that person is liable for the excise tax under this act. (4) If a taxpayer fails to file a return or to maintain or preserve sufficient records as prescribed in this section, or the department has reason to believe that any records maintained or returns filed are inaccurate or incomplete and that additional excise taxes are due, the department may assess the amount of the excise tax due from the taxpayer based on an indirect audit procedure or any other information that is available or that may become available to the department. That assessment is considered prima facie correct for the purpose of this act and the burden of proof of refuting the assessment is on the taxpayer. An indirect audit of a taxpayer under this subsection must be conducted in accordance with 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 to 205.31, and the standards published by the department under section 21 of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.21, and must include all of the following elements: (a) A review of the taxpayer's books and records. The department may use an indirect method to test the accuracy of the taxpayer's books and records. (b) Both the credibility of the evidence and the reasonableness of the conclusion must be evaluated before any determination of tax liability is made. (c) The department may use any method to reconstruct income, deductions, or expenses that is reasonable under the circumstances. The department may use third-party records in the reconstruction. (d) The department shall investigate all reasonable evidence presented by the taxpayer refuting the computation. (5) If a taxpayer has filed all the required returns and has maintained and preserved sufficient records as required under this section, the department shall not base a tax deficiency determination or assessment on any indirect audit procedure unless the department has a documented reason to believe that any records maintained or returns filed are inaccurate or incomplete and that additional taxes are due. (6) As used in this section: (a) "Indirect audit procedure" is an audit method that involves the determination of tax liabilities through an analysis of a taxpayer's business activities using information from a range of sources beyond the taxpayer's declaration and formal books and records. (b) "Sufficient records" means records that meet the department's need to determine the tax due under this act. Sec. 29. (1) A service provider that fails to register with the department as required under section 13 is guilty of a misdemeanor. The court shall impose a fine of $25.00 for each day the failure, neglect, or refusal to register continues after notice to the service provider from the department that the service provider is required to register under this act. (2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1), a service provider that that fails, neglects or refuses to comply with this act is guilty of a misdemeanor. For a first offense, the court shall impose a fine of not less than $100.00 or more than $500.00. For a second or subsequent offense, the court may sentence the service provider to imprisonment for not more than 1 year and shall impose a fine of not less than $500.00 or more than $5,000.00. Sec. 31. A purchaser that refuses to pay the excise tax as required by this act, refuses to comply with the provisions of this act, or makes a statement to a service provider or provides a certificate to a service provider, falsely indicating that the provision of a covered service is not subject to the excise tax levied under this act, is guilty of a misdemeanor. The court may sentence the purchaser to imprisonment for not more than 1 year and shall impose a fine of not less than $500.00 or more than $5,000.00. ARTICLE 4. DISPOSITION OF THE EXCISE TAX Sec. 41. The department shall deposit all money collected under this act in the property tax savings reimbursement fund created in section 43. Sec. 43. (1) The property tax savings reimbursement fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received under section 41 or from any other source in the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (3) The department is the administrator of the fund for audits of the fund. (4) The department shall expend money from the fund, on appropriation, as described in subsections (5) to (7). (5) Subject to subsections (8) and (9), for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall distribute an amount to the state school aid fund that equals the total received by the state school aid fund for the 2026 property tax year under both of the following, as determined by the department: (a) Former 1993 PA 330. (b) Former 1993 PA 331. (6) Subject to subsections (8) and (9), for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027 and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall distribute an amount to each municipality that equals the revenue lost as the result of the exemption under section 9q of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.9q. For purposes of this subsection, revenue lost equals the total revenue received by the municipality for the 2026 property tax year under the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.1 to 211.155, that is attributable to personal property to which the exemption under section 9q of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.9q, applies, as determined by the department. (7) Following the distributions under subsections (5) and (6), the remaining balance of the fund shall lapse to the general fund. (8) For each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall adjust the amounts under subsections (5) and (6) by amounts determined by the state treasurer at the end of each calendar year to reflect the cumulative annual percentage change in the Consumer Price Index, not to exceed 3%, rounded up to the nearest $100.00. If the cumulative annual percentage change in the Consumer Price Index is negative for a fiscal year, then the adjustment for that fiscal year is zero. (9) If the money in the fund is insufficient to fully compensate the entities described in subsections (5) and (6), payments from the fund must be made as follows, except that any contractual obligations enforceable against this state must be satisfied first: (a) Money must first be distributed under subsection (5). (b) After the distribution under subdivision (a), any remaining money must be distributed under subsection (6) and prorated amongst the municipalities. (10) As used in this section: (a) "Consumer Price Index" means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for this state from the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. (b) "Fund" means the property tax savings reimbursement fund created in subsection (1). (c) "Municipality" means that term as defined in section 5 of the local community stabilization authority act, 2014 PA 86, MCL 123.1345. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5878 (request no. H00174'25). (b) House Bill No. 5874 (request no. H01857'25). (c) House Bill No. 5875 (request no. H01857'25 a). (d) House Bill No. 5876 (request no. H01857'25 b). (e) House Bill No. 5877 (request no. H01857'25 c). (f) House Bill No. 5873 (request no. H06023'26). (g) House Bill No. 5879 (request no. H06226'26).